District of Columbia statutes.
10-503.02

Duty of Capitol Police.

It shall be the duty of the Capitol Police hereafter to prevent any portion of the Capitol Grounds and terraces from being used as playgrounds or otherwise, so far as may be necessary to protect the public property, turf and grass from destruction.

Apr. 29, 1876, 19 Stat. 41, ch. 86

History

1981 Ed., § 9-107.
1973 Ed., § 9-118a.

Prior Codifications